District of Columbia statutes.
7-1671.09

Medical Marijuana Advisory Committee.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish a Medical Marijuana Advisory Committee (“Committee”), which shall monitor:

(1)

Best practices in other states that allow the use of medical marijuana;

(2)

Scientific research on the medical use of marijuana; and

(3)

The effectiveness of the District’s medical marijuana program.

(b)

No later than January 1, 2012, the Committee shall submit a report to the Mayor and the Council recommending:

(1)

Whether the District of Columbia should allow qualifying patients and caregivers to cultivate medical marijuana;

(2)

How to implement and regulate cultivation of medical marijuana by qualifying patients and caregivers; and

(3)

Any other comments the Committee believes to be important.

Feb. 25, 2010, D.C. Law 13-315, § 10
as added July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-210, § 2, 57 DCR 4798